District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-532

Lessor’s rights to residual interest.

In addition to any other necessary recovery permitted by this article or other law, the lessor may recover from the lessee an amount that will fully compensate the lessor for any loss or damage to the lessor’s residual interest in the goods caused by the default of the lessee.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

History

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-532.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source: None.

This section recognizes the right of the lessor to recover under this Article (as well as under other law) from the lessee for failure to comply with the lease obligations as to the condition of leased goods when returned to the lessor, for failure to return the goods at the end of the lease, or for any other default which causes loss or injury to the lessor’s residual interest in the goods.